Utah statutes.
19-6-1104.   Applications for industrial byproduct reuse -- Approval by the executive secretary.

(1)  A person may submit to the executive secretary an application for reuse of an industrial byproduct from an inactive industrial site, as defined in Section 17C-1-102.

(2)  The executive secretary shall respond to an application submitted under Subsection (1) within 60 days of the day on which the executive secretary determines the application is complete.

(3)  The executive secretary shall approve an application submitted under Subsection (1) if the applicant shows:

(a)  the industrial byproduct meets the applicable health risk standard;

(b)  the industrial byproduct satisfies the applicable toxicity characteristic leaching procedure; and

(c)  the proposed method of installation and type of reuse meet the applicable health risk standard.

